District of Columbia statutes.
32-703

Enforcement by civil action.

Any person or employer may bring a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction against the appropriate domestic partner(s) to recover damages as a result of:

(1)

A false statement in a declaration of domestic partnership or a false assertion of family membership; or

(2)

A failure to notify the Mayor or the employer of a change in the status of the domestic partnership or family membership.

June 11, 1992, D.C. Law 9-114, § 4, 39 DCR 2861

History

1981 Ed., § 36-1403.

Prior Codifications